District of Columbia statutes.
23-1301

Pretrial Services Agency for the District of Columbia.

The Pretrial Services Agency for the District of Columbia (hereafter in this subchapter referred to as the “agency”) shall continue in the District of Columbia and shall secure pertinent data and provide for any judicial officer in the District of Columbia or any officer or member of the Metropolitan Police Department issuing citations, reports containing verified information concerning any individual with respect to whom a bail or citation determination is to be made.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Sept. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 753, Pub. L. 95-388, §§ 1, 2
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 16, 58 DCR 1174

Cross References

Bail and collateral security, see § 16-704.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1301.
1973 Ed., § 23-1301.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-377 substituted “Pretrial Services Agency for the District of Columbia” for “District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) enactments, see §§ 601 and 602 of Enhanced Crime Prevention and Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-446, July 21, 2006, 53 DCR 6477).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 516 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 516 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).